Utah statutes.
20A-3-504.   Violations -- Penalties.

(1)  Except as allowed by Section 20A-3-108, a person is guilty of a class C misdemeanor if:

(a)  he allows his ballot to be seen by any other person with an intent to reveal how he is about to vote;

(b)  he states falsely that he is unable to mark his ballot;

(c)  he interferes or attempts to interfere with any person who is inside the voting booth or who is marking a ballot; or

(d)  he induces or attempts to induce any voter who is inside a voting booth or who is marking a ballot to vote to show how he marked his ballot.

(2)  The election judges and clerks shall report any person violating this section to the county attorney or district attorney having state criminal jurisdiction for prosecution.



Amended by Chapter 38, 1993 General Session

